Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,101
Insolvent banks; liquidation; special deputies, assistants; bond or insurance; conditions.

Upon the declaration of insolvency, the director shall require bonds or equivalent commercial insurance policies from the special deputies or assistants in sums and with such condition as the director shall specify, to be approved by the Governor. The costs of any such bond or policy shall be taxed as costs in the liquidation. Such bond or policy shall be conditioned for the faithful performance of duty, and include indemnity to the department as receiver and liquidating agent.

Laws 1929, c. 38, § 14, p. 164;

C.S.1929, § 8-195;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 60, p. 165;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-195;

R.S.1943, § 8-187;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 101, p. 175;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 6.